Missouri, session 2026, HB3352.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 334.046, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 334.046 and 334.048, to read as follows:
334.046. 1. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the board
may grant a temporary license to any otherwise qualified physician to teach or lecture and
provide patient care services related thereto in a program sponsored by an accredited
medical school in the state of Missouri or any accredited hospital. The temporary license
shall not extend beyond twelve months from the date of its issuance and shall terminate
automatically. To be granted a temporary license pursuant to this section, a physician shall
meet all requirements for permanent licensure in the state of Missouri, including those
imposed by rule and regulation; except that, the board may recognize and take into account
the credentials of a physician licensed in other states or in foreign countries. Nothing
contained in this section shall be construed so as to permit the issuance of a temporary license
for locum tenens or other itinerant practices of the healing arts.
2. Within guidelines established by rule and regulation, the board may authorize an
intern or a resident who is otherwise properly enrolled and duly licensed to participate in a
program of graduate medical or osteopathic education in an accredited program in a
contiguous state, to act as an intern or resident in this state; provided, that such activity is a
recognized part of the educational experience offered by that program.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3352 2
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the board may waive
the provisions of sections 334.035 and 334.040, but not section 334.031, and grant a
permanent license to practice as a physician and surgeon to the holder of a temporary license
issued pursuant to this section. The board shall not grant a waiver pursuant to this section
unless and until the applicant has held a temporary license for a minimum of twelve months
preceding the date of application and complies with all requirements the board may impose
by rule or regulation. An applicant for a permanent license pursuant to this section shall
present evidence to the board that the applicant holds a certificate of licensure in any state or
territory of the United States, of the District of Columbia or in a foreign country, authorizing
the applicant to practice in the same manner and to the same extent as physicians and
surgeons are authorized to practice by this chapter.
4. Before granting a waiver pursuant to this section, the board may require the
applicant to achieve a passing score on the federation portion of the state medical board's
special purpose examination (SPEX).
5. If the board grants a waiver pursuant to this section, then the license issued to the
applicant may be limited or restricted to the applicant's board specialty.
6. The board may not grant a waiver pursuant to this section to any applicant who has
failed to achieve a passing score within three attempts on licensing examinations
administered in one or more states or territories of the United States, the District of
Columbia or in any foreign country.
7. Any waiver granted by the board pursuant to this section, or pursuant to section
334.040, shall be granted in the sole discretion of the board. A refusal by the board to grant
such a waiver shall not be appealable to the administrative hearing commission or circuit
court.
334.048. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
board may grant a transitional license to any physician sponsored by an accredited
medical school in this state. A transitional license may be granted to a physician who:
(1) Has practiced for at least two years in this state or another state and is
otherwise in good standing but has let his or her license lapse for a period of no more
than ten years. A physician applying for a transitional license under the provisions of
this subdivision shall not have had his or her license suspended or revoked or otherwise
have had any disciplinary action taken against him or her for any reason; or
(2) Has practiced for at least two years in a foreign country as a licensed
physician in good standing and who is certified by the Educational Commission for
Foreign Medical Graduates (ECFMG). A physician applying for a transitional license
under the provisions of this subdivision shall have the sponsoring accredited medical
school verify and attest that the physician has completed at least three years of

HB 3352 3
postgraduate training in a country whose requirements are substantially similar to or
greater than those of this state.
2. The transitional license shall not extend more than three years from the date
of its issuance and shall terminate automatically. To be granted a transitional license
under this section, a physician shall meet all requirements for permanent licensure in
this state, including those imposed by rule and regulation, except that the board may
waive certain requirements according to the provisions of this section. Nothing
contained in this section shall be construed to permit the issuance of a transitional
license for locum tenens or other itinerant practices of the healing arts.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the board may
waive the provisions of sections 334.035 and 334.040, but not section 334.031, and grant
a permanent license to practice as a physician and surgeon to the holder of a transitional
license issued under this section. The board shall not grant a waiver under this section
unless and until the applicant has held a transitional license for a minimum of three
years preceding the date of application, has been employed by a sponsoring accredited
medical school for at least three years, and complies with all requirements the board
may impose by rule or regulation. An applicant for a permanent license under this
section shall present evidence to the board that the applicant holds a certificate of
licensure in any state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia, or in
a foreign country, authorizing the applicant to practice in the same manner and to the
same extent as physicians and surgeons are authorized to practice by this chapter.
4. Before granting a waiver under this section, the board may require the
applicant to achieve a passing score on the Federation of State Medical Boards' Special
Purpose Examination (SPEX).
5. If the board grants a waiver under this section, the license issued to the
applicant may be limited or restricted to the applicant's board specialty.
6. The board shall not grant a waiver under this section to any applicant who has
failed to achieve a passing score within three attempts on licensing examinations
administered in one or more states or territories of the United States or the District of
Columbia or in any foreign country.
7. Any waiver granted by the board under this section, or under section 334.040,
shall be granted in the sole discretion of the board. A refusal by the board to grant such
a waiver shall not be appealable to the administrative hearing commission or circuit
court.
✔